Florida, session 2026, HB891.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsections (8) through (10) of section 11.92,
Florida Statutes, as created by HB 889, 2026 Regular Session,
are renumbered as subsections (9) through (11), respectively,
and a new subsection (8) is added to that section, to read:
11.92 Office of the Corrections Ombudsman.—
(8)(a) Correspondence and communications between
incarcerated persons or the public and the office, the
Ombudsman, the members of the committee, and office staff are
confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I
of the State Constitution.
(b) This subsection is subject to the Open Government
Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and is repealed
on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from repeal
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb891-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 891 2026
through reenactment by the Legislature.
Section 2. The Legislature finds that it is a public
necessity that correspondence and communications with the Office
of the Corrections Ombudsman and the Corrections Oversight
Committee be made confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1),
Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
Constitution. Public disclosure of such correspondence and
communications could jeopardize the safety of incarcerated
persons. It is essential to the functioning of the office that
incarcerated persons and the public feel free to communicate
with the office concerning conditions in and operations of
correctional facilities. The public records exemption is
necessary to protect incarcerated persons from retaliation by
correctional officers who are under investigation as a result of
communications with the office.
Section 3. This act shall take effect on the same date
that HB 889 or similar legislation takes effect, if such
legislation is adopted in the same legislative session or an
extension thereof and becomes a law.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb891-00